Utah statutes.
48-2c-1202 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Voluntary cancellation of certificate.

Articles of organization may be canceled voluntarily at any time by consent of all members or their successors in interest by submitting to the division for filing a certificate of cancellation that sets forth:

(1)  the name of the company;

(2)  the date of filing of its articles of organization;

(3)  the effective date of cancellation, which shall be a date certain, if the cancellation is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

(4)  any other information the person filing the certificate determines to be appropriate.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

